Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202542-1410
Funding; allocation.

Funding for family resource and juvenile assessment centers shall be allocated to prioritize partnerships with local grassroots organizations and businesses to sustain services and provide direct community investment. Subject to available funds, each designated center shall receive up to five hundred thousand dollars per center annually from the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund. If such funds are not available from the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund, no General Funds may be used. No more than ten percent of funds appropriated for the Family Resource and Juvenile Assessment Center Pilot Program, up to fifty thousand dollars per year, shall be used to administer the pilot program.

Laws 2025, LB48, § 10.